North Dakota, session 69, SB2107.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 11 of section 50-11.1-03 of the North Dakota Century Code
is amended and reenacted as follows:
11. Any hours of department-approved training related to child care which an applicant or staff
member completes after submitting the fees and application as required under subsection 8
must be counted toward the licensing annual requirements for the following year.
SECTION 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act becomes effective on January 1, 2026.

S. B. NO. 2107 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2107.
Senate Vote: Yeas 44 Nays 0 Absent 3
House Vote: Yeas 91 Nays 2 Absent 1
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State